Hawaii statutes.
§92-28
State service fees; increase or decrease of. Any law to the contrary
notwithstanding, the fees or other nontax revenues assessed or charged by any
board, commission, or other governmental agency may be increased or decreased
by the body in an amount not to exceed fifty per cent of the statutorily
assessed fee or nontax revenue, to maintain a reasonable relation between the
revenues derived from such fee or nontax revenue and the cost or value of
services rendered, comparability among fees imposed by the State, or any other
purpose which it may deem necessary and reasonable; provided that:

(1) The authority to
increase or decrease fees or nontax revenues shall be subject to the approval
of the governor and extend only to the following: chapters 36, 92, 94, 142,
144, 145, 147, 150, 171, 188, 189, 231, 269, 271, 321, 338, 373, 412, 414,
414D, 415A, 417E, 419, 421, 421C, 421H, 421I, 425, 425E, 428, 431, 436E, 437,
437B, 438, 439, 440, 441, 442, 443B, 444, 447, 448, 448E, 448F, 448H, 451A,
451J, 452, 453, 453D, 454, 455, 456, 457, 457A, 457B, 457G, 458, 459, 460J,
461, 461J, 462A, 463, 463E, 464, 465, 466, 466K, 467, 467E, 468E, 468L, 468M,
469, 471, 482, 482E, 484, 485A, 501, 502, 505, 514A, 514B, 514E, 572, 574, and
846 (part II);

(2) The authority to
increase or decrease fees or nontax revenues under the chapters listed in
paragraph (1) that are established by the department of commerce and consumer
affairs shall apply to fees or nontax revenues established by statute or rule;

(3) The authority to increase
or decrease fees or nontax revenues established by the University of Hawaii
under chapter 304A shall be subject to the approval of the board of regents;
provided that the board's approval of any increase or decrease in tuition for
regular credit courses shall be preceded by an open public meeting held during
or prior to the semester preceding the semester to which the tuition applies;

(4) This section shall not
apply to judicial fees as may be set by any chapter cited in this section;

(5) The authority to
increase or decrease fees or nontax revenues pursuant to this section shall be
exempt from the public notice and public hearing requirements of chapter 91;
and

(6) Fees for copies of
proposed and final rules and public notices of proposed rulemaking actions
under chapter 91 shall not exceed 10 cents a page, as required by section
91-2.5. [L 1964, c 32, §2; Supp, §7-4.5; HRS §92-28; am L 1983, c 167, §2; am L
1985, c 270, §4; am L 1987, c 283, §15; am L 1988, c 141, §10; am L 1989, c 89,
§2; am L 1993, c 350, §3; am L 1995, c 95, §1; am L 1996, c 251, §2; am L 1999,
c 301, §3(3); am L 2002, c 40, §3; am L 2003, c 210, §2; am L 2004, c 116, §2;
am L 2006, c 75, §6 and c 229, §4; am L 2007, c 155, §§1, 2; am L 2009, c 11,
§26]

Note

Chapters 454 and 846 (part II) referred to in paragraph (1) are
repealed. For present provisions, see chapter 454F and chapter 286 (part XVI),
respectively.

Attorney General Opinions

Basis against which the 50 per cent maximum is to be applied
is the individual fee item or individual nontax revenue. Att. Gen. Op. 64-24.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next